test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IHL_STEM_3.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_IHL_STEM_3 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_IHL_STEM_3

     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgéelaa
     hlgihl+V+INDIRECT+PAST: hlgéelaan
     hlgihl+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: hlgéelaas
     hlgihl+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: hlgéelaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: hlgéel'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+CERTAIN+PAST: hlgéel'ahlanggan
     hlgihl+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgéel'ahlanggiinii
     hlgihl+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: hlgéel'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: hlgéelaa'ahlang
     hlgihl+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: hlgéelaa'ahlanggaa
     hlgihl+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: hlgéelaa'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+REFLEXIVE: hlgéel'ahl
